Utah statutes.
58-55-601.   Payment -- Account designated.
When making any payment to a materialman, supplier, contractor, or
subcontractor with whom he has a running account, or with whom he has more
than one contract, or to whom he is otherwise indebted, the contractor shall
designate the contract under which the payment is made or the items of account
to which it is to be applied.  When a payment for materials or labor is made
to a subcontractor or materialman, the subcontractor or materialman shall
demand of the person making the payment a designation of the account and the
items of account to which the payment is to apply.  In cases where a lien is
claimed for materials furnished or labor performed by a subcontractor or
materialman, it is a defense to the claim that a payment was made by the owner
to the contractor for the materials and was so designated and paid over to the
subcontractor or materialman, if when the payment was received by the
subcontractor or materialman, he did not demand a designation of the account
and of the items of account to which the payment was to be applied.
